California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(4) 100 percent of the redemption amount when the payment is made during or prior to the fourth fiscal year following the year in which election was made to pay delinquent taxes in installments.

(b) On parcels tax defaulted prior to June 15, 1974, interest shall be computed at the rate of 12 percent per month accruing on the first day of each month following the preceding payment, on the balance of the redemption amount.

(c) On parcels tax defaulted on and after June 15, 1974, interest shall be computed at the rate of 1 percent per month accruing on the first day of each month following the preceding payment, on the balance of the redemption amount.

(d) On parcels tax defaulted on and after June 15, 1982, interest shall be computed at the rate of 112 percent per month accruing on the first day of each month following the preceding payment, on the balance of the redemption amount.

Payments made under this section shall be computed and paid in the same manner as a redemption, and the receipts for those payments shall show that the payments are for the use of the real estate under this plan for payment of delinquent taxes in installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

4222.

If all payments are not made on or before the dates prescribed, the property may become subject to a power of sale pursuant to Section 3691 in the same manner as if no election to pay delinquent taxes in installments had been made. In the event that the default occurs at the time the second or subsequent installment is due and the assessee or agent of the assessee can, by substantial evidence, convince the tax collector that the payment was not made through any fault of the assessee, the tax collector may reinstate the account upon receipt of a payment in an amount reflecting the installment due plus interest under Section 4221 to the date of reinstatement, provided the payment is physically received by the tax collector prior to the time the property becomes subject to the tax collector’s power to sell or prior to June 30 of the current fiscal year, whichever occurs earlier.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1184) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 830, Sec. 23.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

4222.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the tax collector of any county that is designated by the Governor to be in a state of emergency or disaster due to a major misfortune or calamity and is therefore an eligible county for tax relief, as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 194) of Part 2, may defer for a period of one year payments under an installment plan if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The installment plan was already in existence, or the taxpayer had submitted an application
 for the installment plan, at the time deferral is requested by the assessee or the agent of the assessee.

(2) The assessee or the agent of the assessee can establish to the satisfaction of the tax collector that the assessee incurred substantial disaster damage as defined in Section 194 in connection with their property as a result of the disaster.

(3) The assessee or the agent of the assessee files an application for deferral with the tax collector on or before September 1 of the following fiscal year.

(4) The assessee is not receiving any other relief relating to the disaster.

(b) This section does not preclude the assessment of
 interest in connection with the deferral of any installment payment. Any interest so assessed shall be due and payable together with the deferred installment payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4223.

Payments under this article are not a redemption or partial redemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

4225.

The redemption certificate for a redemption under this article shall show:

(a) The amounts used to arrive at the redemption amount at the time of an election to pay delinquent taxes in installments;

(b) The portions of the redemption amount and interest previously paid, including all credits allowed;

(c) The portion of the redemption amount and interest required to make the redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1076.)
-------------------------------------------

4226.

Except as provided in this article, the redemption shall be made in the usual manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1076.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Credits and Distribution [4336. - 4337.]

4336.

When property is redeemed on which delinquent taxes have been paid in installments, there shall be credited on the amount necessary to redeem the total amount of back taxes previously paid, including an allowance for interest paid pursuant to Section 4221. The credit shall be allowed after computation of the amount necessary to redeem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 992, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

4337.

When payment of delinquent taxes in installments on any property was started under any provision of law and payment of delinquent taxes in installments on the property is later started after default in payment, there shall be credited on the amount payable the total amount of back taxes paid during the course of the defaulted plan or plans, including an allowance for interest paid pursuant to Section 4221. This credit is in addition to and not a substitute for the payment of any part of any installment payable and shall be allowed after the first installment is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 992, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Preparation of Abstract Lists [4372. - 4379.]

4372.

The abstract list shall contain all information in the rolls from which it is prepared relating to unpaid items and shall be in such form, to be approved by the Controller, as may be most easily and accurately used in effecting the redemption of property thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

4373.

Each year after property becomes tax defaulted by operation of law, the tax collector shall insert in the abstract list, or prepare an abstract list of, unpaid items from the roll in which the tax-defaulted properties are recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

4374.

Upon completion of any abstract list or the insertion of new information therein the auditor shall certify thereon that it contains a true and correct statement of all information relating to property on which all or any part of the taxes are unpaid which is contained in the rolls specified by the auditor in the certificate. All entries formerly required by law to be made on the specified rolls shall thereafter be made on the abstract lists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

4375.

When defects in description or form or clerical errors occur because of the preparation of the abstract list, they may be corrected on the abstract list under the same conditions, except as to time, and in the same manner as they would be corrected if they occurred on any secured roll or delinquent roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

4376.

The abstract list, or a copy certified by the tax collector, showing unpaid taxes against any property, is prima facie evidence of the assessment, the property assessed, the delinquency, the amount of taxes due and unpaid, and that there has been compliance with all forms of law relating to assessment, equalization, and levy of the taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1101.)
-------------------------------------------

4377.

Any delinquent tax roll and original secured roll on which it is based containing the information set forth in the abstract list may be destroyed by the county officer or officers in possession of the rolls if (a) the destruction, in all cases, has first been approved by order of the board of supervisors of the county, (b) the abstract list has first been certified as correct and complete by the county auditor, and (c) a certified, permanent record on a substitute media has been prepared in accordance with Section 26205 of the Government Code and the substitute media will be retained for at least 12 years from the date of the creation of the original document. The substitute media may also be destroyed following the expiration of the 12-year retention period.

The abstract list prepared under Section 4373, or any photographic record thereof, shall be retained by the tax collector for at least two years after the time the lien has been removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

4378.

Upon the destruction of the delinquent tax roll and the original secured roll pursuant to Section 4377, any property or interest therein which theretofore became delinquent but does not appear in the abstract list shall conclusively be presumed to have been redeemed and the delinquency satisfied and any notices of tax default and power of sale canceled, unless there then appears of record in the proper county a tax deed on sale thereof pursuant to this division. However, the conclusive presumption of payment and redemption prior to sale pursuant to this division shall not apply as against a tax deed issued within one year prior to the destruction of the delinquent tax roll and original secured roll, unless the tax deed was not recorded, in the proper county, within one year after the date of the deed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

4379.

No proceeding or defense based upon a right or claim under a tax deed issued pursuant to this division upon property or any interest therein not appearing upon the abstract list shall be maintained or asserted after the destruction of the delinquent tax roll and original secured roll pursuant to Section 4377 unless the tax deed was recorded in the proper county at the date of the destruction or within one year after the date of the deed, whichever is later. If the proceeding or defense is barred by this section, the only recourse of the grantee in the tax deed, or the grantee’s successor in interest, shall be to obtain a refund in the manner prescribed in Section 3729 upon claim made within one year after the bar arises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 61.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7.5. TAX CERTIFICATES [4501. - 4531.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Definitions [4501. - 4505.]

4501.

The definitions in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.

“Assigned penalties” means, with respect to any taxes and assessments assigned pursuant to a tax certificate, any and all penalties related thereto which are or may be payable pursuant to Sections 2617, 2618, 2704, 2705, 2759, 2760, 2761, 2762, and 4103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

“Delinquency date” means the date on which a delinquency penalty attaches to taxes pursuant to Section 75.52, 2617, 2618, 2704, 2705, 2759, 2760, 2761, or 2762, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

“Secured roll property” means property that remains on the secured roll after taxes thereon have been declared in default.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4505.

“Tax certificate” means the intangible property right created upon a sale by the tax collector pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4521) of the right to receive all amounts in respect of a delinquency in connection with secured roll property or property on the supplemental roll.

(a) A tax certificate shall be issued for a separately assessed parcel, or for multiple parcels with separate assessments, that are delinquent or defaulted at the time of the offer of the sale of the tax certificate and not for any subsequent year taxes or assessments. A tax certificate shall identify the parcel or parcels securing the certificate, bear the date of the purchase of the tax certificate, the name of the purchaser (or any successor) of the tax certificate, the total amount due, including taxes and assessments, being assigned to the purchaser of the tax certificate (as they may be reduced pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4525), and the purchase price of the tax certificate.

(b) Tax certificates may be in the form of physical certificates or may be in book-entry form, including an electronic medium, in the discretion of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Authorization and Administration [4511. - 4513.]

4511.

Any county may, upon the recommendation of the tax collector, and by resolution of the board of supervisors of that county adopted during the fiscal year for which it is to first apply, sell tax certificates. If the board orders the discontinuance of the procedures authorized by this part, all of the following shall occur:

(a) All of the provisions of this part, other than Section 4521, shall remain in full force and effect until all tax certificates have been canceled.

(b) The county shall maintain the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund until all tax certificates have been canceled.

(c) After all tax certificates have been canceled, all funds on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund shall be paid to the tax collector to be applied and distributed in the same manner as amounts received from the collection of taxes and assessments and any costs, fees, penalties, or other amounts related thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 962, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4512.

In each county that elects to sell tax certificates, there shall be created a Tax Certificate Redemption Fund. Moneys in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in Section 4527.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4513.

Nothing in this part shall reduce, change, affect, or otherwise alter the rights of any property owner or taxpayer that exist in the absence of this part. Under no circumstances shall the property owner or taxpayer be required to pay more than would have been owed if the sale of a tax certificate had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Sale of Tax Certificates [4521. - 4531.]

4521.

Commencing no earlier than the date the property is declared in default, the tax collector may offer for sale as provided in Section 4511 tax certificates for those defaulted taxes in connection with that secured roll property or that property on the supplemental roll, along with any defaulted taxes for any previous year that have not previously been sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4522.

For purposes of Chapter 1A (commencing with Section 4653) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4701) of Part 8, the receipt by the tax collector of the proceeds of the sale of a tax certificate shall be deemed to be the receipt by the tax collector of the due and unpaid taxes and assessments specified in that tax certificate and, if in excess of that amount, the related delinquency penalty set forth in Section 2617, 2618, 2704, 2705, 2759, 2760, 2761, or 2762. The provisions of this part shall not be construed as removing any lien for taxes or extinguishing any unpaid taxes or assessments or fees, penalties, costs, or other amounts related thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4523.

The proceeds from the sale of a tax certificate shall be applied as follows:

(a) (1) To the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund, in an amount equal to a minimum of 3 percent of the proceeds from that sale. However, if the amount of the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund is equal to or greater than 3 percent of the then current amount of taxes and assessments assigned under all outstanding tax certificates, those proceeds shall be applied as provided in subdivision (b). The amount deposited under this paragraph shall be in lieu of any amount otherwise required pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4701) of Part 8.

(2) Any amount on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund shall be invested at the direction of the county treasurer as required by law. All interest earned on the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund shall be paid to the county.

(b) The balance of the proceeds shall be applied as follows:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the balance shall be distributed in the same manner as amounts received from the collection of taxes and assessments and costs, fees, penalties, and other amounts related thereto.

(2) In the case of a county that has elected the alternative procedure for the distribution of property tax levies pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4701) of Part 8 of Division 1, the balance shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4524.

(a) Upon the receipt by the tax collector of the entire amount of the taxes, assessments, and assigned penalties assigned by a tax certificate, the tax collector shall pay that amount to the holder of the tax certificate, cancel the tax certificate, and enter the fact of the cancellation in the tax certificate record opposite the entry of the sale of the tax certificate. The tax collector shall make the payments from amounts it receives of those taxes, assessments, and assigned penalties, whether those amounts are received by the tax collector by payment of those amounts, by redemption pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 4101), by sale of the parcel pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3436) of Part 6, or otherwise.

(b) If, pursuant to Section 2636, 2708, 2772, or 4143 or otherwise, the tax collector receives only an installment or portion of the amounts in respect of the taxes, assessments, and assigned penalties (or interest in the case of an installment plan of redemption) assigned by a tax certificate, the tax collector shall pay that amount to the holder of the tax certificate and make a corresponding adjustment to the amounts set forth in the tax certificate and the tax certificate record.

(c) If, pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2801) of Part 5 or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4131) of Part 7, part of an assessment of tax on a parcel specified in a tax certificate is paid or redeemed, the tax collector shall pay to the holder of the tax certificate that portion of the payments relating to the amounts assigned under the tax certificate and shall adjust the information in the tax certificate and the tax certificate record accordingly.

(d) Any amount collected shall be first applied to the oldest outstanding certificate. The taxpayer shall still be considered delinquent with respect to any unredeemed certificate on that property.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any partial payment with respect to a tax certificate, including annual payments from installment plan of redemption, shall be applied to the monthly penalty (or interest in the case of an installment plan of redemption) amount first.

(f) This section shall apply notwithstanding any other provision of Chapter 1C (commencing with Section 4656) or Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671) of Part 8 or any other provision of this code to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4525.

The tax collector may stop the collection of amounts in respect of a delinquency by the holder of a tax certificate at any time by canceling that tax certificate and paying to the holder of that tax certificate from amounts on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund the amount owed in respect of that delinquency. This action may be taken at the sole discretion of the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4526.

A tax certificate shall not be considered as having any situs in the county in which the real property is located for which the tax certificate is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4527.

(a) The tax collector shall pay to the holder of a tax certificate, from amounts on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund, an amount equal to the purchase price of the tax certificate, together with interest thereon at a rate equal to the rate the county would have to pay on any refund to a taxpayer for the same fiscal year, that rate to be applied to all amounts paid with respect to the certificate from the date of the sale of the tax certificate, and shall cancel the tax certificate if any of the following occur:

(1) The taxes and assessments assigned by the tax certificate had been paid prior to the sale of the tax certificate.

(2) After the sale of the tax certificate, the taxes and assessments assigned by the tax certificate are canceled for any reason other than the payment of the taxes and assessments.

(3) The lien on the parcel specified in the tax certificate is removed, other than pursuant to Section 2195 or 4105.2, or by order of the federal bankruptcy court, prior to the time the holder of the tax certificate has received all amounts due under the tax certificate.

(4) The parcel specified in the tax certificate is deeded to a taxing agency pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771) of Part 6.

(5) Upon the request of the holder of the tax certificate, when there has been a violation of Section 3441 with respect to the parcel specified in the tax certificate.

(b) Promptly after obtaining knowledge of any occurrence described in subdivision (a), the tax collector shall notify, in writing, the holder of the applicable tax certificate.

(c) If the delinquency penalty assigned by a tax certificate is canceled pursuant to Section 2610.5 or Section 4985.2, or for any other reason other than the payment in full of the penalty, then, at the option of the holder of the tax certificate, the tax collector shall, from amounts on deposit in the tax certificate redemption fund, do either of the following:

(1) Pay to the holder of the tax certificate an amount equal to the purchase price of the tax certificate, together with interest thereon at a rate equal to the rate the county would have to pay on any refund to a taxpayer for the same fiscal year, that rate to be applied to all amounts paid in respect of the certificate from the date of the sale of the tax certificate, and cancel the tax certificate.

(2) Pay to the holder of the tax certificate an amount equal to the difference between the purchase price of the tax certificate and the total amount of taxes and assessments assigned by the tax certificate, together with interest on that amount at a rate equal to the rate the county would have to pay on any refund to a taxpayer for the same fiscal year, that rate to be applied to all amounts paid in respect of the certificate from the date of the sale of the tax certificate, and adjust the information contained in the tax certificate and the tax certificate record accordingly.

(d) If a redemption certificate is issued pursuant to Section 4105.2 with respect to a parcel specified in a tax certificate, and all amounts assigned under the tax certificate, including, without limitation, amounts due under Section 4103, are not paid to the holder of the tax certificate, the tax collector shall immediately pay to the holder of the tax certificate, from amounts on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund, any amount so assigned but not paid.

(e) The tax collector may use amounts on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund to make the payments permitted under Sections 3729, 3731, 4920, and 5103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4528.

(a) (1) The tax collector may sell tax certificates by any form of public or private sale, including, but not limited to, an auction, a negotiated sale, or a bulk sale. Except as provided in subdivision (c), the price received for a tax certificate shall not be less than the amount of taxes and assessments being assigned thereby. Prior to any sale of any tax certificates, the tax collector shall do all of the following:

(A) Determine the size of the offering and the parcels to be included in the sale.

(B) Determine the fees necessary to conduct the sale and maintain adequate tax certificate records.

(C) Establish rules and procedures for the making of offers on any tax certificate.

(D) Publish the determinations, fees, rules, and procedures described in this paragraph.

(E) Make these determinations, fees, rules, and procedures available to any person upon request.

(2) The tax collector has the right to accept or reject any or all bids in his or her sole discretion, subject to the determinations, fees, rules, and procedures described in paragraph (1).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the tax collector may not sell a tax certificate if any of the following apply:

(1) The parcel is not on the secured roll or supplemental roll.

(2) The parcel is owned by a governmental agency.

(3) The total amount of taxes and assessments to be assigned thereby is less than one hundred dollars ($100), unless the parcel is included in a bulk sale.

(4) The parcel has a recorded public notice concerning pollution or contamination to the degree that the parcel poses a public health concern or environmental hazard.

(5) The parcel was subject to a proceeding in federal bankruptcy court prior to the sale of the tax certificate.

(6) The parcel was subject to any condemnation proceedings prior to the sale of the tax certificate.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the tax collector may sell or resell tax certificates for parcels described in paragraphs (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b), any certificate subject to the Sailors and Soldiers Relief Act, and for parcels described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4527, at a discount, in accordance with the determinations, fees, rules, and procedures published by the tax collector.

(d) If, pursuant to Section 4521, the tax collector is required to offer for sale a tax certificate for which there exists an outstanding tax certificate for the assignment of taxes and assessments for a previous year, until the date occurring six months after the date specified in Section 4521, the tax collector shall offer to sell the tax certificate to the holder of the outstanding tax certificate. The tax collector shall notify the holder of the outstanding tax certificate by certified mail of the default requiring the issuance of an additional tax certificate with respect to the same parcel, and of the tax certificate holder’s right, until the date one month after the receipt of this notice, to purchase the additional certificate on the same terms as the outstanding certificate. In addition, the holder of the outstanding tax certificate shall have the right of first refusal to purchase the tax certificate with respect to the same parcel at the highest bid amount until all tax certificates with respect to that parcel are redeemed or canceled. During the six-month period, at the option of the holder of the most recently issued outstanding tax certificate, the tax collector shall sell the tax certificate to the holder of the outstanding tax certificate on the same terms as that outstanding tax certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4529.

The tax collector shall make and maintain the tax certificate record which shall be a list of all the tax certificates sold, showing the date of the sale, a description of the parcel, the name of the purchaser (or the successor), the purchase price, the amount of any payments received by the holder, and how those amounts were applied to the taxes, assessments, and assigned penalties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4530.

Any tax certificate may be transferred at any time before it is canceled by endorsement by the tax collector, if the tax certificate is held in physical form, or by electronic transfer, if that tax certificate is held on book-entry form. The tax collector shall modify the tax certificate to indicate the new holder. The official endorsement of a tax certificate by the tax collector with the date and its entry on the tax certificate record, together with a notation showing the new holder, shall be sufficient evidence of the assignment of the tax certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4531.

(a) A holder of a tax certificate may apply to the tax collector for a duplicate certificate if the original certificate has been lost or destroyed. The tax certificate holder shall give an affidavit to the tax collector stating that the affiant is the owner of the tax certificate and that the tax certificate was lost or destroyed. The tax certificate holder shall pay a fee for the issuance of the duplicated tax certificate in an amount as determined by the tax collector.

(b) The tax collector shall issue a duplicate tax certificate, and shall plainly mark or stamp that tax certificate as a duplicate, and enter the fact of the duplicate in the tax certificate record opposite the entry of the sale for which the lost or destroyed tax certificate was issued. He or she shall enter in the same place a notation of the alleged loss or destruction, whether or not the duplicate certificate is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 699, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. DISTRIBUTION [4651. - 4717.]



  CHAPTER 1. Generally [4651. - 4651.4.]

4651.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this part, “fund” includes:

(a) A revenue district.

(b) A taxing agency.

(c) Annual installments of assessments charged on the roll.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.2.

Unless otherwise provided by law, any amount distributed to the State pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the State General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.4.

The county treasurer and the county auditor shall each keep an accurate account of money received which is to be distributed and shall, at the time the treasurer is required to settle with the State for money in his possession belonging to the State, make a detailed, verified report to the Controller, in the form prescribed by the Controller, of all amounts distributed to the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1a. Secured Roll [4653. - 4653.8.]

4653.

As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes all taxes, assessments, installments of assessments charged on the current secured roll, and payments in lieu of taxes on property belonging to the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.2.

The county auditor may receive and distribute payments in lieu of taxes, other than city taxes, on property which belongs to the United States and is exempt from taxation. Unless otherwise prescribed by the agency making such payments, the amounts received shall be distributed as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.4.

Taxes shall be distributed to each fund on the basis of the tax rate established for the current secured roll on which they are charged and in the same proportion that the tax rate for each fund bears to the total tax rate applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.6.

Amounts paid as delinquent penalties shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 430.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.7.

Amounts paid as penalties for failure to provide change-in-ownership statements shall be distributed to the county general fund.

This section shall also apply to those penalties when collected from entries on the unsecured roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1224, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.8.

The cost charge amounts collected by the tax collector shall be distributed to a county fund for use by the tax collector in covering the cost of preparing and maintaining the delinquent list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1b. Unsecured Roll [4655. - 4655.4.]

4655.

As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes all taxes and assessments charged on the current unsecured roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.2.

Taxes shall be distributed to each fund on the basis of the tax rate established for the current unsecured roll and in the same proportion that the tax rate for each fund bears to the total tax rate applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.4.

Amounts paid as delinquent penalties or accrued legal interest paid on judgments for the recovery of unpaid property taxes rendered by the courts of this state shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1c. Redemptions [4656. - 4656.7.]

4656.

As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes all liens charged on the secured roll which are determined by the application of an ad valorem tax rate. In the case of property not assessed for any year, “taxes” also includes such liens that would have been charged on the secured roll for such year if the property had been assessed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.1.

As used in this chapter “assessments” includes all liens charged on the secured roll which are not determined by the application of an ad valorem tax rate. In the case of property not assessed for any year, “assessments” also includes such liens that would have been charged on the secured roll for such year if the property had been assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.2.

Taxes, including taxes paid in accordance with provisions of Section 4837.5, and all delinquent penalties, interest and redemption penalties accruing thereon, shall be distributed to each fund on the basis of the tax rate established for the fiscal year preceding that in which distribution is made and in the same proportion as the tax rate for each fund bears to the total tax rate applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 126, Sec. 29.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.3.

Assessments, and all delinquent penalties, interest and redemption penalties accruing thereon, shall be distributed to each fund in the same proportion as the assessments due each fund bears to the total amount of assessments due at the time of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.4.

Amounts collected as the cost for preparing the delinquent list shall be distributed to the county general fund. When authorized by the board of supervisors, those amounts shall be distributed to a restricted county fund to be allocated only for the following purposes:

(a) Updating and improving information with respect to delinquent taxes.

(b) Redemption systems.

(c) Monthly settlements with the auditor pursuant to Section 4108.

(d) The collection of taxes by the tax collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 523, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.5.

All redemption fees collected for property tax-defaulted prior to January 1, 1984, shall be distributed 50 percent to the State of California for deposit in the General Fund and 50 percent to the county that is the situs of the tax-defaulted property for deposit in its general fund. Redemption fees collected for property tax defaulted on and after January 1, 1984, shall be distributed five dollars ($5) to the State of California for deposit in the General Fund and ten dollars ($10) to the county that is the situs of the tax-defaulted property for deposit in its general fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.6.

All or any part of moneys received under the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4186) of Part 7 may be held until redemption is made, or may be distibuted as the money is received. The money shall be distributed as provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.7.

On termination of the right of redemption, amounts collected on defaulted installment plans shall be distributed as provided in this chapter, unless previously distributed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1d. Delinquent Unsecured Roll [4658. - 4658.4.]

4658.

As used in this chapter, “taxes” includes all taxes and assessments charged on the delinquent unsecured roll or abstract list of delinquent unsecured taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.2.

Taxes shall be distributed to each fund on the basis of the tax rate established for the fiscal year preceding that in which distribution is made and in the same proportion that the tax rate for each fund bears to the total tax rate applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.4.

Amounts paid as delinquent penalties or accrued legal interest paid on judgments for the recovery of unpaid property taxes rendered by the courts of this state shall be distributed to the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 96.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.3. Distribution of Proceeds From Sale of Tax-Deeded Property [4671. - 4676.]

4671.
